Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.037

State marine mammal.

The orca, Orcinus orca, is hereby designated as the official marine mammal of the state of Washington.

[ 2005 c 51 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2005 c 51: "The legislature finds that many people visit Washington state to watch orcas, the orca is a significant symbol for the Native American culture, there are pods of orcas that migrate annually through Puget Sound, and the orca is easily recognizable because of its distinct markings. The legislature intends to promote orca awareness and to encourage protection of the natural marine habitat by designating the orca as the official marine mammal of the state of Washington." [ 2005 c 51 s 1.]